Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-151
Employable recipients; legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the increase in the number of recipients of county general assistance funds by employable recipients is a cause of great concern among county governments. County officials realize that a part of the recent increase in recipients was caused by the recent economic recession, especially in the rural areas of the state. Recognizing such increase and some of its causes, county officials wish to establish a program designed to encourage employable recipients to enroll in county-approved vocational, rehabilitation, or job training programs or to require employable recipients to perform community service in exchange for county general assistance. The establishment of such a program will result in more persons leading productive lives, less unemployment, and savings for the taxpayers of the state.

Laws 1990, LB 422, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 227, § 1.